District of Columbia statutes.
24-134

Authorization of appropriations.

There are authorized to be appropriated in each fiscal year such sums as may be necessary for the following:

(1)

District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency.

(2)

Supervision of offenders on probation, parole, or supervised release for offenses under the District of Columbia Official Code.

(3)

Operation of the parole system for offenders convicted of offenses under the District of Columbia Official Code.

(4)

Operation of the Trusteeship described in § 24-132.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 751, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11234
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2425, Pub. L. 105-274, §§ 6(b)(2), 7(a)(3)
1981 Ed., § 24-1234.